Oklahoma, session 2026, SB404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER 19 O.S. 2021, Sections 8.1, 8.2,
8.3, 8.4, and 8.5, are hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS










SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB404 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)